Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0785.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 30d. (1) From the state school aid fund money
appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not to
exceed $200,000,000.00 for 2025-2026, and from the general fund
money appropriated in section 11, there is allocated an amount not
to exceed $1,600,000.00 for 2025-2026 only for the purpose of
making payments to participating entities to provide free school
lunch and breakfast to public school and nonpublic school pupils in
grades pre-K to 12.
(2) To receive funding under this section, a participating
CRM S03744'25 (S-1) z18br4


entity must participate in the National School Lunch Program and
must do all of the following:be enrolled in the free school lunch
and breakfast program under section 1271 of the revised school
code, MCL 380.1271.
(a) Provide reimbursable breakfasts and reimbursable lunches
at no cost to all students for any school breakfast program or
school lunch program operated by the participating entity.
(b) Submit information regarding the number of reimbursable
breakfasts and reimbursable lunches served in a manner prescribed
by the department.
(c) Maximize federal reimbursement for reimbursable breakfasts
and reimbursable lunches by operating under the CEP if the
participating entity has an identified student percentage greater
than or equal to the minimum requirement to be eligible to
participate in the CEP. For purposes of this subdivision, all
eligible participating entities must elect CEP on behalf of a
single school, a group or groups of schools, or all schools in the
participating entity, as applicable, in a manner that maximizes
federal reimbursement.
(d) Meet all applicable state and federal standards in its
school breakfast and lunch programs, as determined by the
department.
(e) Take all efforts to maximize and implement policies that
require parents or guardians to fill out relevant family income
information, in a manner prescribed by the department, for the
purposes of determining student eligibility for federal free or
reduced cost meal reimbursement rates and CEP eligibility
determinations.
(f) Forgive all school meal debt related to federally
CRM S03744'25 (S-1) z18br4


reimbursable meals, as determined by the department.
(3) Participating entities are encouraged to offer meals that
meet students' dietary restrictions, including the provision of
gluten-free meals, vegetarian meals, vegan meals, and, upon
request, kosher meals, halal meals, and meals meeting any allergy
restrictions as confirmed by a doctor's note. Participating
entities are encouraged to purchase food from Michigan growers when
possible and practical.
(3) (4) For each eligible participating entity that is
enrolled in the free school lunch and breakfast program under
section 1271 of the revised school code, MCL 380.1271, the
department shall pay an amount equal to the following:
(a) The amount equal to the federal rate per student paid per
pupil per free breakfast and lunch under the Child Nutrition Act of
1966, 42 USC 21 1771 to 1793, and the Richard B. Russell National
School Lunch Act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j, multiplied by the number of
breakfasts and lunches provided by the participating entity to
students, less the federal revenue received by the participating
entity under the school breakfast program and the school lunch
program under the Child Nutrition Act of 1966, 42 USC 21 1771 to
1793, and the Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act, 42 USC
1751 to 1769j, and other state lunch payments received under
section 31d.
(b) The amount equal to the federal rate per student paid per
pupil per free breakfast and lunch under the Child Nutrition Act of
1966, 42 USC 21 1771 to 1793, and the Richard B. Russell National
School Lunch Act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j, multiplied by the number of
breakfasts and lunches provided by the participating entity, as
applicable, to children participating in the Great Start Readiness
CRM S03744'25 (S-1) z18br4


Program great start readiness program under section 32d at the
participating entity, less all other federal and state lunch
payments made for those children. For purposes of this subdivision,
compliance with 7 CFR 226.9 is required. The department shall
assign rates of reimbursement pursuant to 7 CFR 226.9, at least
annually, on the basis of family size and income information
reported by each eligible participating entity. Assigned rates of
reimbursement must be adjusted annually to reflect changes in the
national average payment rates.
(4) (5) Notwithstanding section 17b, the department may make
payments under this section on a schedule determined by the
department.
(5) (6) As used in this section, :
(a) "CEP" means the Community Eligibility Provision under the
Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j.
(b) "Participating "participating entity" means a district,
intermediate district, nonpublic school, or the Michigan Schools
for the Deaf and Blind.that term as defined in section 1271 of the
revised school code, MCL 380.1271.
(6) (7) In addition to the appropriations in section 11, if
the amount allocated in subsection (1) is insufficient to fully
reimburse districts for meals as required in this section, there is
appropriated from the school meals reserve fund created in section
30e the amount necessary to fully fund these reimbursements.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless Senate Bill No. 784 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
CRM S03744'25 (S-1) z18br4